Utah statutes.
76-10-2401.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Building", in addition to its commonly accepted meaning, means any watercraft, aircraft, trailer, sleeping car, or other structure or vehicle adapted for overnight accommodations of persons or for carrying on business and includes:

(a)  each separately secured or occupied portion of the building or vehicle; and

(b)  each structure appurtenant or connected to the building or vehicle.

(2)  "Business" means a retail business dealing in tangible personal property.

(3)  "Enter" means:

(a)  an intrusion of any part of the body; or

(b)  the intrusion of any physical object under the control of the actor.



Amended by Chapter 31, 2002 General Session

